Wyoming, session 2025, HB0148.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 21-17-201, 21-17-202(a) and by
creating a new subsection (c), 22-2-101(a) by creating a
HB0148

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0506
new paragraph (xi), 22-2-104(e), 22-5-101, 22-5-208(c),
22-6-125(a) by creating a new paragraph (ix) and by
renumbering (ix) through (xiv) as (x) through (xv),
22-6-128, 22-18-111(a)(intro) and (b), 22-22-101,
22-22-102(a) and (c), 22-22-201 by creating a new
subsection (c), 22-22-202(a), 22-22-301, 22-22-302 and
22-22-304(a)(i), (ii) and (iv) are amended to read:

21-17-201. Composition; appointment and election of
members; qualifications of members; members ex officio;
quorum.

The government of the university is vested in a board of
twelve (12) nineteen (19) trustees, with fourteen (14)
voting trustees and five (5) ex officio, nonvoting
trustees. Seven (7) of the voting trustees shall be
appointed by the governor, no two (2) of whom may be
residents of the same county of the state and the remaining
seven (7) voting trustees shall be elected as provided by
law. At least one (1) voting trustee shall be appointed by
the governor, and at least one (1) voting trustee shall be
elected from each appointment district pursuant to as
designated in W.S. 9-1-218. Not more than seventy-five
HB0148

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0506
percent (75%) of the members of the board appointed
trustees shall be registered in the same political party.
The governor, the president of the university, the director
of the Wyoming community college commission, the state
superintendent of public instruction and the president of
the associated students of the university are members ex
officio trustees, having the right to speak, but not to
vote. A majority of the voting trustees of the board is a
quorum.

21-17-202. Term; vacancies; appointment of
successors; vacancies; members of faculty disqualified;
removal.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by law for the
initial trustees appointed by the governor after the 2026
general election, the term of office of the appointed
trustees appointed is six (6) years and shall be in
accordance with W.S 28-12-103. During each session of the
legislature, the governor shall nominate, and with the
advice and consent of the senate, appoint successors to
those appointed trustees whose term of office has expired
or will expire before the next session of the legislature.
HB0148

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0506
Any vacancy in the board of appointed trustees caused by
death, resignation, removal from the state or otherwise,
shall be filled by appointment by the governor and
confirmed by the senate as provided in W.S. 28-12-101 and
28-12-102. No member of the faculty, while holding that
position, shall ever be appointed a trustee. The governor
may remove any appointed trustee as provided in W.S.
9-1-202.

(c) Except as otherwise provided by law for the
initial elected trustees, the term of office of the elected
trustees is four (4) years. Any vacancy under the
circumstances provided by W.S. 22-18-101 of an elected
trustee shall be filled within thirty (30) days by action
of the remaining trustees. A person chosen to fill a
vacancy shall serve until the next election of University
of Wyoming trustees. An election shall then be held to fill
any unexpired term.

22-2-101. Applicability and construction of Election
Code generally.

HB0148

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0506
(a) Chapters 1 through 28 of this Election Code apply
to the following elections:

(xi) University of Wyoming board of trustees
elections.

22-2-104. Election dates.

(e) The election of members of the board of trustees
of each school district, and community college district and
the elected University of Wyoming trustees shall be held
for each district and the University of Wyoming on the
first Tuesday after the first Monday in November in general
election years.

22-5-101. How candidates nominated.

Nominations of candidates for all offices filled at a
general election, except school and community college
district offices, the elected University of Wyoming
trustees and special district offices, may be made by
primary election, by petition for nomination as an
independent candidate as provided in W.S. 22-5-301 through
HB0148

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0506
22-5-308 or by convention as provided in W.S. 22-4-303 and
22-4-406.

22-5-208. Filing fees; exception.

(c) A filing fee shall not be required of candidates
for special district director, school district trustee,
community college trustee, elected University of Wyoming
trustee, precinct committeeman or precinct committeewoman.

22-6-125. Order of offices and ballot propositions on
nonpartisan ballots.

(a) The nonpartisan ballot shall contain the offices
and ballot propositions to be voted on in the following
order:

(ix) Candidates for elected University of
Wyoming board of trustees;

(ix)(x) Candidates for special district
directors;

HB0148

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0506
(x)(xi) Candidates for other offices of county
subdivisions;

(xi)(xii) Constitutional amendments;

(xii)(xiii) Initiative propositions;

(xiii)(xiv) Referendum propositions;

(xiv)(xv) Other ballot propositions.

22-6-128. Ballots for other elections.

At the county clerk's discretion, separate ballots for
bond, school and community college districts, the elected
University of Wyoming board of trustees and special
district elections may be required and shall be provided by
the authority responsible for holding the election. Ballots
shall conform as nearly as possible to general requirements
specified by law for the general election ballot, except as
otherwise specifically provided.

HB0148

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0506
22-18-111. Vacancies in other offices; temporary
appointments.

(a) Any vacancy in any other elective office in the
state except representative in congress, or the elected
board of trustees of a school or district, community
college district or the University of Wyoming, shall be
filled by the governing body, or as otherwise provided in
this section, by appointment of a temporary successor. The
person appointed shall serve until a successor for the
remainder of the unexpired term is elected at the next
general election and takes office on the first Monday of
the following January. Provided, if a vacancy in a four
(4) year term of office occurs in the term's second or
subsequent years after the first day for filing an
application for nomination pursuant to W.S. 22-5-209, no
election to fill the vacancy shall be held and the
temporary successor appointed shall serve the remainder of
the unexpired term. The following apply:

(b) The trustees of a school or community college
district or the University of Wyoming shall fill a an
elected office vacancy in office by temporary appointment
HB0148

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0506
in a manner provided by law. If the trustees of a school or
community college district or the University of Wyoming
fail to appoint a person qualified to hold the office to
fill a an elected office vacancy within thirty (30) days
from the date the vacancy occurs, or if, for any reason,
the entire membership of the board of trustees of a school
or community college district or the University of Wyoming
is depleted, the board of county commissioners of the
county or counties involved, within ten (10) days of either
occurrence, shall appoint a person qualified to hold the
office to fill each elected office vacancy until the next
election at which time an election shall be held to fill
the unexpired term, and each appointee shall serve until
his successor is elected and qualified. Each appointee
shall be a resident of the appointment district, trustee
residence area, or election subdistrict, if any, previously
represented.

CHAPTER 22
SCHOOL AND COLLEGE ELECTIONS

HB0148

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0506
22-22-101. Cost of school or community college
district or the University of Wyoming board of trustees
elections.

The cost of a school or community college district or the
University of Wyoming's board of trustees election or
equitably proportioned shares of a concurrent election as
determined by the county clerk shall be paid by the
appropriate board from the funds of the school district, or
the community college district or the University of
Wyoming.

22-22-102. Date of election of trustees; terms.

(a) The election of members of the board of trustees
of each school district, and each community college
district and the University of Wyoming shall be held at the
regular polling places for each district on the Tuesday
next following the first Monday in November in general
election years, except as otherwise provided by law. Terms
of office shall run for four (4) years beginning at 12:00
noon on the first day in December following the election,
except as otherwise provided by law.
HB0148

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0506

(c) Not more than a simple majority of members of the
board of trustees of each school district, and each
community college district and the seven (7) elected
trustees of the University of Wyoming shall be elected at
any election unless the election is to fill an unexpired
term. This subsection shall not apply to the election of
the initial board of a community college district, or the
first regular election of a community college district
board or the initial election of the seven (7) elected
University of Wyoming trustees.

22-22-201. Eligibility for office.

(c) A qualified elector resident in an appointment
district designated in W.S. 9-1-218(b) is eligible to hold
the office of an elected University of Wyoming trustee for
that appointment district as provided in W.S. 21-17-201.

22-22-202. Filing of application; form.

(a) A qualified elector may be nominated for the
office of school district trustee, or member of a community
HB0148

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0506
college board or elected University of Wyoming trustee by
filing an application for election in the office of the
county clerk not more than ninety (90) nor less than
seventy (70) days prior to the election. The application
shall be in substantially the following form:

APPLICATION FOR ELECTION FOR SCHOOL, OR COMMUNITY COLLEGE
OR UNIVERSITY OF WYOMING TRUSTEE

I, the undersigned, swear or affirm that I was born on
...., ....(year), and that I have been a resident of the
State of Wyoming since ...., and that I am a registered
voter of the .... appointment district designated by W.S.
9-1-218(b) and 21-17-201 for the elected University of
Wyoming's trustees or of the school district or community
college district (and resident of trustee residence area or
subdistrict ...., if any), residing at ...., and I do
hereby request that my name, ...., be printed on the ballot
of the election to be held on the .... day of ....,
....(year), as a candidate for the office of .... for a
term of .... years. I hereby declare that if I am elected,
I will qualify for the office.

HB0148

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0506
Dated: ....

.......... (Signature of Candidate)

.... Name as it is to appear on the ballot

ARTICLE 3
SCHOOL, COMMUNITY COLLEGE OR UNIVERSITY OF
WYOMING ELECTION PROCEDURE

22-22-301. Definitions.

As used in this article including W.S. 22-22-301 through
22-22-308, inclusive, the term "district" refers to a
community college district board or a school district board
of trustees.

22-22-302. Conduct of elections.

Unless specifically otherwise provided, a school or
community college district or the University of Wyoming
trustee election shall be governed by the laws regulating
statewide elections and in even-numbered years be conducted
HB0148

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0506
and canvassed by the same election officials, using the
same poll lists, and at the same times and polling places,
as county elections.

22-22-304. Ballot information; format.

(a) The official ballot shall contain the following
information:

(i) The name of the school district, or
community college district or the appointment district
designated in W.S. 9-1-218(b) for elected University of
Wyoming trustees as provided in W.S. 21-17-201;

(ii) The county or counties in which the
district or appointment district is located;

(iv) In districts divided into trustee residence
areas or subdistricts, the trustee residence area or
subdistrict of each candidate and the number to be elected
from each trustee residence area or subdistrict. For the
elected University of Wyoming trustees, the counties
included in the appointment district and the number to be
HB0148

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0506
elected from the appointment district designated in W.S.
9-1-218(b);

Section 2. W.S. 21-17-202(b) and 21-17-207 are
repealed.

Section 3.

(a) The terms of the seven (7) University of Wyoming
trustees elected at the first regular election after the
effective date of this act shall begin as provided by W.S.
22-22-102(a). The four (4) elected trustees receiving the
highest number of votes at the election shall serve four
(4) year terms and the elected trustees receiving the next
three (3) highest number of votes at the election shall
serve two (2) year terms. Thereafter, all terms shall be
for four (4) years in accordance with W.S. 21-17-202(a).

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of the law,
the terms of the twelve (12) existing appointed trustees
shall expire at 11:59 a.m. on the first day in December
following the 2026 general election. As provided by W.S.
28-12-101, the governor shall appoint seven (7) trustees to
HB0148

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0506
the University of Wyoming board of trustees. As designated
by the governor, four (4) appointed trustees shall serve
six (6) year terms and three (3) appointed trustees shall
serve three (3) year terms. Thereafter, all terms shall be
for six (6) years in accordance with W.S. 21-17-202(a).

Section 4. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0148